Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu  of the
limitation on expenditures established at the September  25, 2020, Emergency Board meeting
(Item No. 33), the amount of $27,035,000 is  established for a six-year period beginning July
1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses for construction of Camp Umatilla
barracks facilities from federal funds collected  or received by the Oregon Military Depart-
ment.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5041 (HB 5041-A) Page 1